Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5145YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2138 Section 1. Section 809A.17, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Forfeited property which is a weapon or ammunition 3 shall be deposited with the department of public safety 4 to be disposed of in accordance with the rules of the 5 department. All weapons or ammunition may be held for use in 6 law enforcement, testing, or comparison by the criminalistics 7 laboratory, or destroyed. Ammunition and firearms which are 8 not illegal and are not offensive weapons as defined by section 9 724.1 may be sold by the department as provided in section 10 809.21 , or, upon application and in accordance with department 11 rules, be released to a law enforcement agency . 12 (2) The department of public safety shall conduct an audit 13 annually of all forfeited weapons received under subparagraph 14 (1), including documentation of the use and location of each 15 weapon. 16